Louisiana, session 2026, SB348.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:1420.40 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a sheriff,
municipal police department, or other local law enforcement agency may enter
into a contract with a licensed private service provider to provide
administrative and logistical assistance related to motor vehicle regulatory
enforcement, provided that a commissioned law enforcement officer has
initiated the enforcement action. A "service provider" for purposes of this
Section means any third party contractor providing services to law enforcement
for a city, municipality, or other local law enforcement entity.
B. A service provider operating pursuant to this Section may perform
the following functions:
(1) Plate processing and administrative handling of documentation.
(2) Electronic verification of motor vehicle registration, insurance, or
compliance data using systems authorized by the office of motor vehicles.
(3) Preparation, generation, mailing, or electronic transmission of notices
of noncompliance or other administrative notices following issuance by a law
enforcement officer.
(4) Administrative coordination with towing or storage facilities at the
direction of a law enforcement officer.
(5) Recordkeeping, data entry, reporting, and other administrative tasks
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 348 ENROLLED
required by law or by the contracting law enforcement agency.
C.(1) All services performed by a service provider pursuant to this
Section shall be performed only pursuant to documented direction of the
contracting law enforcement agency. After a lawful enforcement action has been
initiated by a commissioned law enforcement officer, a motorist may voluntarily
execute a written waiver consenting to:
(a) The voluntary surrender of the vehicle license plate by the motorist.
(b) The administrative handling of the license plate by a private service
provider.
(2) A waiver executed pursuant to this Subsection shall be voluntary,
documented in writing or electronic form, and retained in accordance with law
enforcement record keeping. No waiver executed pursuant to this Section shall
be construed to substitute for the lawful authority or actions of a commissioned
law enforcement officer.
D. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to grant police powers or
law enforcement authority to a service provider.
E. The provisions of this Section shall be applicable only to
municipalities incorporated after October 1, 2019.
F. The provisions of this Section shall terminate on July 31, 2028.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.